District of Columbia statutes.
26-131.13

Authority of Commissioner to issue rules and regulations.

The Commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 513, 48 DCR 3244
Banking institutions formed under federal statute, application of District law, see § 26-710.